Oklahoma, session 2025, SB484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-116 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Domestic violence shelter” means a facility providing
temporary housing and services for domestic violence victims;
2. “Domestic violence victim” means any person who:
a. does not have access to normal accommodations as a
result of violence or the threat of violence from a
cohabitant, and
b. otherwise meets the definition of a homeless person,
as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB484 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Entity” means any individual, corporation, company, firm,
partnership, association, trust, state agency, government
instrumentality or agency, institution, county, incorporated
municipality, municipal authority, trust in which any governmental
entity is a beneficiary, venture, or other legal entity however
organized;
4. “Homeless person” means any person who:
a. lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence,
b. has as a primary nighttime residence a publicly or
privately operated shelter designed to provide
temporary living accommodations, or
c. has as a primary nighttime residence a public or
private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as,
regular sleeping accommodations for a human being;
5. “Homeless shelter” means a facility providing temporary
housing and services for homeless persons;
6. “Unaccompanied minor” means any minor who:
a. is not in the physical custody of a parent or
guardian, and
b. otherwise meets the definition of a homeless person,
as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection; and
7. “Youth shelter” means a facility providing temporary housing
and services for unaccompanied minors and includes, but is not
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB484 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

limi ted to, any such facility licensed or operated by the Department
of Human Services or the Office of Juvenile Affairs as a group home,
child care facility, or children’s shelter.
B. In order to preserve public safety, the entity proposing any
zoning request to change or allow for the creation of a homeless
shelter in a municipality of this state with a population less than
three hundred thousand (300,000) according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census, in addition to the notice and public hearing
requirements provided for in Section 43-104 of Title 11 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, shall mail a written notice by regular first-
class mail within thirty (30) days of the hearing to all real
property owners at their last known address within one thousand
(1,000) feet of the proposed location of the homeless shelter, and
shall be responsible for all costs incurred in mailing this notice.
The notice shall contain the:
1. Legal description of the proposed property and the street
address or approximate location within the municipality;
2. Existing zoning requirements of the property and the
description of the change of zoning sought by the applicant; and
3. Date, time, and place of the public hearing.
In addition to the written notice requirements, notice of the
hearing shall be posted on the affected property at least twenty
(20) days before the date of the hearing.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB484 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. The municipal governing body, municipal zoning commission,
or any other such body with zoning authority of the municipality
where the proposed homeless shelter is located, provided the
municipality meets the population requirements in subsection B of
this section, shall not approve any proposed homeless shelter if
such shelter would be located within three thousand (3,000) feet of
any school, school property, public library, municipal park, child
or adult day care facility, or prekindergarten facility.
D. Any homeless shelter that was properly zoned and approved at
its location on the effective date of this act shall be permitted to
continue operating and not be subject to relocation or closure. If
any school, school property, public library, municipal park, child
or adult day care facility, or prekindergarten facility is
established within three thousand (3,000) feet of any homeless
shelter after such homeless shelter has been properly zoned and
approved, the provisions of this section shall not be a cause for
the revocation or closure of such homeless shelter. Any change of
use from a homeless shelter at a location that was properly zoned
and approved on the effective date of this act shall subject such
location to the provisions of this act.
E. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
apply to domestic violence shelters or youth shelters.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB484 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB484 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)